tr: Yakıt Sınıfı: 1-K; 2-K; Bioheat; Premium; Standart; Diğer
nl: Brandstofkwaliteit: 1-K; 2-K; Biowarmte; Premium; Standaard; Andere
en: Fuel grade: 1-K; 2-K; Bioheat; Premium; Standard; Other
sk-SK: Druh paliva: 1-K; 2-K; Bio-teplo; Prémiový; Štandardný; Iné
ko: 연료 등급: 1-K; 2-K; 바이오히트; 프리미엄; 표준; 기타
pt-BR: Grau de combustível: 1-K; 2-K; Bioheat; Premium; Padrão; Outro
hu: Üzemanyag besorolása: 1-K; 2-K; Biohő; Prémium; Normál; Egyéb
nb: Drivstoffklasse: 1-K; 2-K; Biovarme; Premium; Standard; Annet
bg-BG: Клас гориво: 1-K; 2-K; Биотоплина; Премиум; Стандартен; Други
es: Grado de combustible: 1-K; 2-K; Biocalor; Prémium; Estándar; Otros
hr-HR: Kategorija goriva: 1-K; 2-K; Biotoplina; Premium; Standardno; Ostalo
fr: Qualité du carburant: 1000; 2000; Biochaleur; Premium; Standard; Autre
sv: Bränsleklass: 1-K; 2-K; Biovärme; Premium; Standard; Övrigt
da: Brændstofkvalitet: 1-K; 2-K; Biovarme; Premium; Standard; Andet
ja: 燃料グレード: 1-K; 2-K; バイオヒート; プレミアム; スタンダード; その他
cs: Třída paliva: 1-K; 2-K; Bioheat; Premium; Standardní; Jiné
ru: Марка топлива: 1-K; 2-K; Биотепло; Премиум; Стандартный; Другой
lt-LT: Kuro klasė: 1-K; 2-K; „Bioheat“; „Premium“; Standartinis; Kita
pt-PT: Grau de combustível: 1-K; 2-K; Bioaquecimento; Premium; Padrão; Outro
pl: Klasa paliwa: 1-K; 2-K; Biociepło; Premium; Standard; Inne
fi: Polttoaineluokka: 1-K; 2-K; Biolämpö; Premium; Tavallinen; Muu
it: Grado del carburante: 1-K; 2-K; Biocalore; Premium; Standard; Altro
zh-CN: 燃油等级: 1-K; 2-K; 生物热; 优质; 标准; 其他
ro-RO: Grad combustibil: 1-K; 2-K; Bioîncălzire; Premium; Standard; Altele
zh-TW: 燃油等級: 1-K; 2-K; 生物熱; 高級; 標準; 其他
el: Κατηγορία καυσίμου: 1-K; 2-K; Βιοθερμότητα; Ανώτερης ποιότητας; Κανονικό; Άλλο
sl-SI: Razred goriva: 1-K; 2-K; Biotoplota; Premium; Standardna; Drugo
de: Kraftstoffqualität: 1-K; 2-K; Biowärme; Premium; Standard; Sonstiges
vi: Cấp nhiên liệu: 1-K; 2-K; Nhiệt sinh học; Cao cấp; Bánh xe tiêu chuẩn; Khác
th: เกรดน้ำมันเชื้อเพลิง: 1-K; 2-K; ไบโอฮีต; พรีเมียม; มาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ